Colorado, session 2026A, HB1408.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-3-208, amend (1)
and (6); and add (1.5) as follows:
2-3-208. Budget requests - base budget submissions -
amendments - supplemental appropriation requests - deadlines -
definitions.
(1) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(a) "BASE BUDGET" MEANS THE TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED IN
THE ANNUAL GENERAL APPROPRIATION ACT AND OTHER LEGISLATION
ENACTED IN THE PRIOR STATE FISCAL YEAR PLUS:
(I) OUT-YEAR COSTS OR SAVINGS FROM LEGISLATION ADOPTED IN
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

PRIOR YEARS THAT WERE NOT INCLUDED IN THE APPROPRIATIONS FOR THE
PRECEDING STATE FISCAL YEAR; AND
(II) BUDGET ADJUSTMENTS FROM PRIOR YEARS THAT WERE NOT
INCLUDED IN THE APPROPRIATIONS FOR THE PRECEDING STATE FISCAL YEAR.
(a) (b) "Budget request amendment" means any change to a budget
request for the upcoming state fiscal year that a state agency submits to the
joint budget committee.
(b) (c) "State agency" means any department, commission, council,
board, bureau, committee, institution of higher education, agency, or other
governmental unit of the executive, legislative, or judicial branch of state
government that receives an appropriation or is otherwise included in the
annual general appropriation act.
(1.5) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2026, AND ON OR BEFORE EACH
SEPTEMBER 1 THEREAFTER, A STATE AGENCY SHALL SUBMIT ITS BASE
BUDGET FOR THE UPCOMING STATE FISCAL YEAR TO THE JOINT BUDGET
COMMITTEE AND THE OFFICE OF STATE PLANNING AND BUDGETING IN A
FORMAT AGREED UPON BY THE STATE AGENCIES AND THE OFFICE OF STATE
PLANNING AND BUDGETING IN COORDINATION WITH JOINT BUDGET
COMMITTEE STAFF.
(6) For purposes of this section, the office of administrative services
for independent agencies in the judicial department, created in section
13-100-103, is a state agency. Included agencies, as defined in section
13-100-102, are not state agencies for purposes of BASE BUDGET
SUBMISSIONS OR budget request submissions.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-100-104, amend (1)
as follows:
13-100-104. Budget requests and annual statewide compensation
adjustments.
(1) (a) THE OFFICE SHALL SUBMIT A SINGLE, CONSOLIDATED BASE
BUDGET, PURSUANT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF SECTION 2-3-208, THAT
INCLUDES THE BASE BUDGET INFORMATION FROM EACH INCLUDED AGENCY,
IF PROVIDED.
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1408

(b) The office shall submit a single, consolidated budget request,
pursuant to the requirements of section 2-3-208, that includes budget
request amendments from each included agency, if provided.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-37-302, add (3)(c)
as follows:
24-37-302. Responsibilities of the office of state planning and
budgeting.
(3) (c) AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE PRIOR TO THE SUBMISSION OF THE
NOVEMBER 1 BUDGET REQUEST, THE DIRECTOR OF THE OFFICE OF STATE
PLANNING AND BUDGETING, IN COLLABORATION WITH THE EXECUTIVE
DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL, SHALL PROVIDE
INFORMATION RELATED TO THE OFFICE'S CALCULATIONS FOR COMMON
POLICIES, AS ANNUALLY SUBMITTED IN THE GOVERNOR'S NOVEMBER 1
BUDGET REQUEST, TO THE DEPARTMENTS, INSTITUTIONS, AND AGENCIES OF
THE EXECUTIVE, JUDICIAL, AND LEGISLATIVE BRANCHES OF STATE
GOVERNMENT.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1408

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1408